Washington statutes.
RCW 44.16.080

Examination to be private.

Unless otherwise directed by the committee, it shall in all cases be the duty of the commissioner to examine, in private, every witness attending before him or her, and not to make public the particulars of such examination, when so made in private, until the same shall be made public by order of the house or legislature appointing the committee.

[ 2009 c 549 s 6007; 1895 c 6 s 7; RRS s 8184.]